California, session 20252026, SB469.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 64.6 is added to the Labor Code, to read:64.6. (a) The department shall establish the California Public Infrastructure Task Force, composed of representatives of all of the following:(1) The Labor and Workforce Development Agency.(2) The Transportation Agency.(3) The Department of Transportation.(4) The Department of General Services.(5) The Civil Rights Department.(6) The California Workforce Development Board.(7) Local workforce development boards.(8) Unions.(9) Contractors and subcontractors.(10) Nonprofit organizations.(b) The task force shall do all of the following:(1) Conduct regular meetings to make recommendations regarding recruiting from underrepresented communities and removing barriers to employment in public infrastructure projects for underrepresented communities. (2) Conduct outreach and engagement activities with contractors and subcontractors to promote employment in public infrastructure projects for underrepresented communities.(3) Provide ongoing compliance assistance at the prebid and postbid stages to contractors and subcontractors in public infrastructure projects regarding their nondiscrimination obligations.(4) Evaluate the efforts of contractors and subcontractors to recruit and utilize talent from underrepresented communities in public infrastructure projects.